Alabama, session 2026rs, SB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-24, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
Page 1

amended to read as follows:
SB142 INTRODUCED
"§13A-6-24
(a) A person commits the crime of reckless endangerment
if he or she does either of the following:
(1) recklessly Recklessly engages in conduct which that
creates a substantial risk of serious physical injury to
another personindividual.
(2) Recklessly engages in conduct that creates a
substantial risk of serious physical injury to multiple
individuals.
(b)(1) Reckless endangerment A violation of subdivision
(a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2)a. Except as provided in paragraph b., a violation
of subdivision (a)(2) is a Class C felony.
b. A violation of subdivision (a)(2) is a Class B
felony if the person uses a deadly weapon or dangerous
instrument in the commission of the offense."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2